Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Miscellaneous Health Coverage Provisions
205.6405.
Definitions for KRS 205.6405 to 205.6408.

As used in KRS 205.6405 to 205.6408:

“Assessment” means the hospital assessment authorized by KRS 205.6406;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services;

“Department” means the Department for Medicaid Services;

“Excess disproportionate share taxes” means any excess provider tax revenues collected under KRS 142.303 that are not needed to fund the state share of hospital disproportionate share payments under KRS 205.640 due to federal disproportionate share allotments being reduced and limited to the portion of provider tax revenues collected under KRS 142.303 necessary to fund the state share of the difference between the unreduced disproportionate share allotment and the reduced disproportionate share allotment;

“Intergovernmental transfer” means any transfer of money by or on behalf of a public agency for purposes of qualifying funds for federal financial participation in accordance with 42 C.F.R. sec. 433.51;

“Long-term acute hospital” means an in-state hospital that is certified as a long-term care hospital under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395ww(d)(1)(B)(iv);

“Managed care” means the provision of Medicaid benefits through managed care organizations under contract with the department pursuant to 42 C.F.R. sec. 438;

“Managed care gap” means the difference between the maximum actuarially sound amount that can be included in managed care rates for hospital inpatient services provided by qualifying hospitals and out-of-state hospitals and the amount of total payments for hospital inpatient services provided by qualifying hospitals and out-of-state hospitals paid by managed care organizations. For purposes of the managed care gap, total payments shall include only those supplemental payments made to a qualifying hospital and shall exclude payments established under KRS 205.6405 to 205.6408;

“Managed care organization” means an entity contracted with the department to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to 42 C.F.R. sec. 438;

“Non-state government-owned hospital” means the same as non-state government-owned or operated facilities in 42 C.F.R. sec. 447.272 and represents one (1) group of hospitals for purposes of estimating the upper payment limit;

“University hospital” means a state university teaching hospital, owned or operated by either the University of Kentucky College of Medicine or the University of Louisville School of Medicine, including a hospital owned or operated by a related organization pursuant to 42 C.F.R. sec. 413.17;

“Pediatric teaching hospital” means the same as in KRS 205.565;

“Private hospitals” means the same as privately owned and operated facilities in 42 C.F.R. sec. 447.272 and represents one (1) group of hospitals for purposes of estimating the upper payment limit;

“Program year” means the state fiscal year during which an assessment is assessed and rate improvement payments are made;

“Psychiatric access hospital” means an in-state psychiatric hospital licensed under KRS Chapter 216B that:

Is not located in a Metropolitan Statistical Area;

Provides at least sixty-five thousand (65,000) days of inpatient care as reflected in the department’s hospital rate data for state fiscal year 1998-1999;

Provides at least twenty percent (20%) of inpatient care to Medicaid-eligible recipients as reflected in the department’s hospital rate data for state fiscal year 1998-1999; and

Provides at least five thousand (5,000) days of inpatient psychiatric care to Medicaid recipients in a state fiscal year;

“Qualifying hospital” means a Medicaid-participating, in-state hospital licensed under KRS Chapter 216B, including a long-term acute hospital, but excluding a university hospital and a state mental hospital defined in KRS 205.639. The department may, but is not required to, exclude critical access hospitals from the definition of “qualifying hospital” for purposes of calculating the quarterly assessments. Notwithstanding the permission referenced in this subsection, or any other provision of the law to the contrary, the department may include critical access hospitals for purposes of calculating and paying the quarterly supplemental payments authorized in KRS 205.6406;

“Qualifying hospital disproportionate share percentage” means a percentage equal to the amount of hospital provider taxes paid pursuant to KRS 142.303 by qualifying hospitals in state fiscal year 2016-2017 divided by the amount of hospital provider taxes paid pursuant to KRS 142.303 by all hospitals in state fiscal year 2016-2017;

“University hospital disproportionate share percentage” means a percentage equal to the amount of hospital provider taxes paid pursuant to KRS 142.303 by university hospitals and state mental hospitals, as defined in KRS 205.639, in state fiscal year 2016-2017 divided by the amount of hospital provider taxes paid pursuant to KRS 142.303 by all hospitals in fiscal year 2016-2017;

“Upper payment limit” or “UPL” means the methodology permitted by federal regulation to achieve the maximum allowable amount on aggregate hospital Medicaid payments to non-state government-owned hospitals and private hospitals under 42 C.F.R. sec. 447.272. A separate UPL shall be estimated for non-state government-owned hospitals and private hospitals; and

“UPL gap” means the difference between the UPL and amount of total fee-for-service payments paid by the department for hospital inpatient services provided by non-state government-owned hospitals and private hospitals to Medicaid beneficiaries and excluding payments established under KRS 205.6405 to 205.6408. A separate UPL gap shall be estimated for the non-state government-owned hospitals and private hospitals.

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 114, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 60, § 1, effective March 22, 2021.

205.6406.
Hospital rate improvement programs — Calculation and payment of assessment on hospitals to provide state matching dollars for federal Medicaid funds — Supplemental payments to hospitals — Federal participation and approval required for implementation of programs — Modification upon approval of supplemental payment formula.

To the extent allowable under federal law, the department shall develop the following programs to increase Medicaid reimbursement for inpatient hospital services provided by a qualifying hospital to Medicaid recipients:

A program to increase inpatient reimbursement to qualifying hospitals within the Medicaid fee-for-service program in an aggregate amount equivalent to the UPL gap; and

A program to increase inpatient reimbursement to qualifying hospitals within the Medicaid managed care program in an aggregate amount equivalent to the managed care gap.

On an annual basis prior to the start of each program year, the department shall determine:

The maximum allowable UPL for inpatient services provided in the Kentucky Medicaid fee-for-service program;

The fee-for-service UPL gap for applicable ownership groups;

A per discharge uniform add-on amount to be applied to Medicaid fee-for-service discharges at qualifying hospitals for that program year, determined by dividing the UPL gap for the applicable ownership group by total fee-for-service hospital inpatient discharges at qualifying hospitals in the data used to calculate the UPL gap. Claims for discharges that already receive an enhanced rate at qualifying hospitals that also are classified as a pediatric teaching hospital or as a psychiatric access hospital shall be excluded from the calculation of the per discharge uniform add-on, unless the department is required to include these claims to obtain federal approval;

The maximum managed care gap for inpatient services; and

A per discharge uniform add-on amount to be applied to Medicaid managed care discharges at qualifying hospitals for that program year in an amount that is calculated by dividing the managed care gap by total managed care in-state qualifying hospital inpatient discharges in the data used to calculate the managed care gap. Claims for discharges that already receive an enhanced rate at qualifying hospitals that also are classified as a pediatric teaching hospital or as a psychiatric access hospital shall be excluded from the calculation of the per discharge uniform add-on, unless the department is required to include these claims to obtain federal approval.

On a quarterly basis in the program year, the department shall:

Calculate a fee-for-service quarterly supplemental payment for each qualifying hospital using fee-for-service claims for inpatient discharges paid in the quarter to the qualifying hospital multiplied by the uniform add-on amount determined in subsection (2)(c) of this section;

Calculate a managed care quarterly supplemental payment for each qualifying hospital to be paid by each managed care organization using managed care encounter claims for inpatient discharges received in the quarter multiplied by the uniform add-on amount determined in subsection (2)(e) of this section;

Make the quarterly supplemental payment calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection;

Provide each managed care organization with a listing of the supplemental payments to be paid by each managed care organization to each qualifying hospital;

Provide each managed care organization with a supplemental capitation payment to cover the managed care organization’s quarterly supplemental payments to be paid to qualifying hospitals in the quarter;

Determine the amount of state funds necessary to obtain federal matching funds that, in the aggregate, equal the total quarterly supplemental payments to be paid to all qualifying hospitals in both the fee-for-service and the Medicaid managed care programs;

Determine a per discharge hospital assessment for the quarter for each qualifying hospital, which shall be calculated by first applying towards the state share calculated under paragraph (f) of this subsection the qualifying hospital disproportionate share percentage of the excess disproportionate share taxes and then dividing the remaining state share by the total discharges reported by all in-state qualifying hospitals on the Medicare cost report filed by those qualifying hospitals in the calendar year two (2) years prior to the program year;

Determine each qualifying hospital’s quarterly assessment by multiplying the assessment established in paragraph (g) of this subsection by the hospital’s total discharges from the qualifying hospital’s Medicare cost report filed in the calendar year two (2) years prior to the program year; and

Provide each qualifying hospital with a notice sent on the same day as the distribution to managed care organizations of the supplemental capitation payments pursuant to paragraph (e) of this subsection, of the qualifying hospital’s quarterly assessment, that shall state the total amount due from the assessment, the date payment is due, the total number of paid claims for inpatient discharges used to calculate the qualifying hospital’s quarterly supplemental payments, and the amount of quarterly supplemental payments due to be received by the qualifying hospital from the department and each Medicaid managed care organization.

In calculating the quarterly supplemental payments under subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section for qualifying hospitals that are also classified as a pediatric teaching hospital or as a psychiatric access hospital, no add-on shall be applied to the paid claims for the services for which that hospital also receives supplemental payments pursuant to state plan methodologies and managed care contracts in effect on January 1, 2019.

Each qualifying hospital shall receive four (4) quarterly supplemental payments in the program year, as determined under subsection (3) of this section.

Medicaid managed care organizations shall pay the supplemental payments to qualifying hospitals within five (5) business days of receiving the supplemental capitation payment from the department.

A qualifying hospital shall pay its quarterly assessment no later than fifteen (15) days from the date the qualifying hospital is notified of the assessment from the department. A non-state government-owned hospital may make payment of its assessment through an intergovernmental transfer. The department may delay or withhold a portion of the supplemental payment if a hospital is delinquent in its payment of a quarterly assessment.

The department shall complete the actions required under subsection (3) of this section expeditiously and within the same quarter as all required information is received.

Qualifying hospitals may notify the department of errors in the data used to make a quarterly supplemental payment by providing documentation within thirty (30) days of receipt of a quarterly supplemental payment from a Medicaid managed care organization. If the department agrees that an error occurred in a qualifying hospital’s quarterly supplemental payment, the department shall reconcile the payment error through an adjustment in the qualifying hospital’s next quarterly supplemental payment.

The programs in this section shall not be implemented if federal financial participation is not available or if the provider tax waiver is not approved. A qualifying hospital shall have no obligation to pay an assessment if any federal agency determines that federal financial participation is not available for any assessment. Any assessments received by the department that cannot be matched with federal funds shall be returned pro rata to the qualified hospitals that paid the assessments.

The department may implement the hospital rate improvement programs only if Medicaid state plan amendments required for federal financial participation are approved by the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

The assessment authorized under KRS 205.6405 to 205.6408 shall be restricted for use to accomplish the inpatient reimbursement increases established under this section. The Commonwealth shall not maintain or revert funds received under KRS 205.6405 to 205.6408 to the state general fund, except that the department may receive two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in state funds each program year to administer the programs. The department shall not establish Medicaid fee-for-service rate-setting methodology changes that result in rate reductions from policies in effect as of October 1, 2018, for acute care hospitals and July 1, 2019, for hospitals paid on a per diem basis.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of KRS 205.6405 to 205.6408.

If the department submits, and the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) approves, a supplemental payment formula that permits the managed care gap to be calculated based upon a percentage of average commercial rates (ACR) that results in a total annual supplemental payment greater than eighty percent (80%) of ACR instead of the Medicare upper payment limit, then the hospital rate improvement programs shall be modified as follows:

The amount of funds the department may receive to administer the programs as stated in subsection (12) of this section shall be replaced by an administrative fee that shall be calculated to be an amount equal to four percent (4%) of the assessment collected under this section. The administrative fee payable under this paragraph shall accrue only for supplemental payments attributable to state fiscal year 2021-2022 and for state fiscal years thereafter so long as CMS approves the supplemental payment formula in accordance with this subsection. The administrative fee shall be paid within thirty (30) days after supplemental payments are issued to qualifying hospitals; and

The department shall not be required under KRS 205.6408 to transfer any excess disproportionate share taxes to the hospital Medicaid assessment fund for use as state matching dollars for the payments made under this section.

At least thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of each program year, the department shall provide each qualifying hospital the opportunity to verify the base data to be utilized in both the fee-for-service and managed care gap calculations, with data sources and methodologies identified.

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 114, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 60, § 2, effective March 22, 2021.

205.6407.
Hospital Medicaid assessment fund.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury the hospital Medicaid assessment fund for the purpose of holding assessments collected under KRS 205.6406 and funds transferred pursuant to KRS 205.6408.

All assessments collected shall be deposited into the fund and transferred to the department on a quarterly basis to be distributed only for the purpose of administering the provisions of KRS 205.6406.

Any fund amounts remaining in the fund after the cessation of the collection of the assessment under KRS 205.6406 shall be refunded to qualifying hospitals on a pro rata basis based upon the assessments paid by each qualifying hospital for the program year that ended immediately before the cessation of the collection of the assessment.

Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year and shall be used to reduce the assessments in the subsequent program year.

Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.

Moneys deposited into the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section and shall not be appropriated or transferred by the General Assembly for any other purpose.

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 114, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

205.6408.
Uses of excess disproportionate share taxes.

Beginning in state fiscal year 2020 and continuing thereafter, the qualifying hospital disproportionate share percentage of the excess disproportionate share taxes shall be transferred to the hospital Medicaid assessment fund and used for the state matching dollars for the payments made under KRS 205.6406. The university hospital disproportionate share percentage of the excess disproportionate share taxes shall be used for the state matching dollars for supplemental payments to university hospitals or used for state mental hospital reimbursement purposes, as applicable.

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 114, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

205.641.
Disproportionate share funds paid to acute care hospitals and private psychiatric hospitals. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 310, § 3, effective April 4, 2000; repealed by 2018 ch. 76, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

205.642.
Pervasive developmental disorders — Definition for KRS 200.654, 200.660, 347.020, and 387.510 — Waiver application — Report.

As used in this section and KRS 200.654, 200.660, 347.020, and 387.510, “pervasive developmental disorders” has the same meaning as in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, fourth edition (DSM-IV). The term includes five (5) diagnostic subcategories:

Autistic disorder;

Pervasive disorder not otherwise specified;

Asperger’s disorder;

Rett’s disorder; and

Childhood disintegrative disorder.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall make application, within three (3) months of July 15, 2002, to the Federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for a waiver to provide services and supports to individuals who:

Are Medicaid eligible;

Have an Axis I diagnosis of a pervasive developmental disorder;

Are institutionalized or at risk for institutionalization; and

Require a coordinated plan of medically necessary community-based behavioral health services.

The waiver application shall include services that are documented to be effective in the treatment of pervasive developmental disorders and consistent with clinical best practices.

The waiver application shall specify the required credentials for the providers of each service.

The cabinet shall cap the number of children served under the waiver program to insure budget neutrality based upon the expenditures for children with Pervasive Developmental Disorders that were served under the IMPACT Plus Program during fiscal years 2001-2002.

The cabinet shall include in the waiver application those items that are necessary to ensure the waiver operates within the designated dollars, including but not limited to a maximum number of individuals to be served and a maximum dollar amount that can be expended for an individual.

The waiver shall be coordinated with and shall not supplant services provided by schools under KRS Chapter 157 or services provided under KRS Chapters 200 and 347. Nothing in this section shall affect or limit a school district’s ability to obtain Medicaid reimbursement for school-related health services.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall report information on the number of individuals receiving services under the waiver, the cost and type of services received, and any available nonidentifying information pertaining to individual outcomes upon request.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 162, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2017 ch. 80, § 35, effective June 29, 2017.

205.643.
IMPACT Plus Program — Provider to receive copy of criteria used in audit, evaluation, or review.

As used in this section, “IMPACT Plus Program” means the program of community-based behavioral health services provided to an eligible IMPACT Plus recipient through an agreement between the Department for Medicaid Services and the Department for Public Health as the state agency for the federal Title V, Maternal and Child Health Services Block Grant, 42 U.S.C. secs. 701 to 710.

Before the Cabinet for Health and Family Services performs a program audit, evaluation, or review of an IMPACT Plus Program provider, the cabinet shall provide the provider with a copy of the criteria to be used in the audit, evaluation, or review. A copy of the findings, including a list of any deficiencies, shall be sent to the provider within sixty (60) calendar days from the first day the audit, evaluation, or review starts.

History.
Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 158, § 25, effective July 12, 2012.

205.645.
Recognition of varying overhead costs.

Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 205.560, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall recognize the reasonable and appropriate varying overhead costs associated with different areas of specialty for the purposes of establishing the standard reimbursement rate for physician services, dental services, and services provided by other independent providers under the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program.

History.
Enact. Acts 1993 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 21, effective June 8, 1993; 1998, ch. 426, § 218, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 259, effective June 20, 2005.

205.646.
External independent third-party review of Medicaid managed care organization’s final decision denying a health care service or a claim for reimbursement — Submission of multiple claims in a single review — Appeal — Administrative regulations — Applicability of statute.

As used in this section:

“Administrative appeals hearing” means a formal adjudicatory proceeding conducted by the administrative hearing tribunal of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;

“Department” means the Department for Medicaid Services;

“External independent third-party review” means a review performed by an independent third party outside of the Medicaid managed care organization’s internal appeal process pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the department;

“Medicaid managed care organization” means an entity for which the Department for Medicaid Services has contracted to serve as a managed care organization as defined in 42 C.F.R. sec. 438.2; and

“Provider” means any person or entity licensed in Kentucky as defined in KRS 304.17A-700(9) that provides covered services to enrollees.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a provider who has exhausted the written internal appeals process of a Medicaid managed care organization shall be entitled to an external independent third-party review of the Medicaid managed care organization’s final decision that denies, in whole or in part, a health care service to an enrollee or a claim for reimbursement to a provider for a health care service rendered by the provider to an enrollee of the Medicaid managed care organization. A provider may submit multiple claims to be appealed in a single external independent third-party review if the provider alleges that a Medicaid managed care organization has implemented a policy or practice that results in the denial, in whole or in part, of those claims.

A Medicaid managed care organization’s letter to a provider reflecting the final decision of the provider’s internal appeal shall include:

A statement that the provider’s internal appeal rights within the Medicaid managed care organization have been exhausted;

A statement that the provider is entitled to an external independent third-party review; and

The time period and address to request an external independent third-party review.

A Medicaid managed care organization or provider shall be entitled to appeal a final decision of the external independent third-party review to the administrative hearing tribunal within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for an administrative hearing to be held in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. An appeal shall be filed within thirty (30) days from the appealing party’s receipt of the final decision of the external independent third-party review. A decision of the administrative hearing tribunal shall be final for purposes of judicial appeal. Any appeal of a final decision of an external independent third-party review involving the submission of multiple claims as allowed under subsection (2) of this section shall be conducted as a single administrative hearing under this subsection.

Within one hundred twenty (120) days after April 8, 2016, the department shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the external independent third-party review as required by this section.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish reasonable fees, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), to defray expenses associated with an administrative hearing that shall be paid by the party who does not prevail in the administrative hearing. If the administrative hearing is an appeal of a final decision of an external independent third-party review involving the submission of multiple claims as allowed under subsection (2) of this section, only one (1) fee shall be assessed under this subsection against the party who does not prevail.

This section shall apply to all contracts or master agreements between Medicaid managed care organizations and the Commonwealth of Kentucky entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2016.

HISTORY:
2016 ch. 55, § 1, effective April 8, 2016; 2019 ch. 36, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

205.647.
State pharmacy benefit manager’s report to Department for Medicaid Services — Requirements for Medicaid services contracts entered into or renewed on or after March 27, 2020 — Administrative regulations — Reimbursement rates between pharmacy benefit manager and contracted pharmacy.

As used in this section, “state pharmacy benefit manager” means a pharmacy benefit manager, as defined in KRS 304.9-020, contracted by the department, pursuant to KRS 205.5512, to administer pharmacy benefits for all Medicaid recipients enrolled in a managed care organization in the Commonwealth.

The state pharmacy benefit manager shall, upon receipt of a request from the Department for Medicaid Services, provide the following information to the Department for Medicaid Services in a form and manner prescribed by the Department for Medicaid Services:

The total Medicaid dollars paid to the state pharmacy benefit manager by a managed care organization and the total amount of Medicaid dollars paid to the pharmacy benefit manager by a managed care organization which were not subsequently paid to a pharmacy licensed in Kentucky;

The average reimbursement, by drug ingredient cost, dispensing fee, and any other fee paid by the state pharmacy benefit manager to licensed pharmacies with which the state pharmacy benefit manager shares common ownership, management, or control; or which are owned, managed, or controlled by any of the state pharmacy benefit manager’s management companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or companies otherwise affiliated by a common owner, manager, or holding company; or which share any common members on the board of directors; or which share managers in common.
(b) 1.

The average reimbursement, by drug ingredient cost, dispensing fee, and any other fee paid by the state pharmacy benefit manager to licensed pharmacies with which the state pharmacy benefit manager shares common ownership, management, or control; or which are owned, managed, or controlled by any of the state pharmacy benefit manager’s management companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or companies otherwise affiliated by a common owner, manager, or holding company; or which share any common members on the board of directors; or which share managers in common.

For the purposes of this subsection, “average reimbursement” means a statistical methodology selected by the Department for Medicaid Services via any administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to this section which shall include, at a minimum, the median and mean;

The average reimbursement, by drug ingredient cost, dispensing fee, and any other fee, paid by the state pharmacy benefit manager to pharmacies licensed in Kentucky which operate more than ten (10) locations;

The average reimbursement by drug ingredient cost, dispensing fee, and any other fee, paid by the state pharmacy benefit manager to pharmacies licensed in Kentucky which operate ten (10) or fewer locations; and

All common ownership, management, common members of a board of directors, shared managers, or control of the state pharmacy benefit manager, or any of the state pharmacy benefit manager’s management companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or companies otherwise affiliated by a common owner, manager, or holding company with any managed care organization contracted to administer Kentucky Medicaid benefits, any entity which contracts on behalf of a pharmacy, or any pharmacy services administration organization; or any common ownership, management, common members of a board of directors, shared managers, or control of a pharmacy services administration organization that is contracted with the state pharmacy benefit manager, with any drug wholesaler or distributor or any of the pharmacy services administration organization’s management companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or companies otherwise affiliated by a common owner, common members of a board of directors, manager, or holding company.

All information provided by the state pharmacy benefit manager pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall reflect data for the most recent full calendar year and shall be divided by month. This information shall be managed by the Department for Medicaid Services in accordance with applicable law and shall be exempt from KRS 61.870 to 61.884 in accordance with KRS 61.878(1)(c).

Any contract entered into or renewed for the delivery of Medicaid services by a managed care organization on or after March 27, 2020, shall comply with the following requirements:

The Department for Medicaid Services shall, in accordance with KRS 205.5514, set or create, and may change at any time for any reason, reimbursement rates between the state pharmacy benefit manager and a contracted pharmacy, or an entity which contracts on behalf of a pharmacy. Reimbursement rates shall include dispensing fees which take into account applicable guidance by the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services;

All laws and administrative regulations promulgated by the Department for Medicaid Services, including but not limited to the regulation of maximum allowable costs;

The Department for Medicaid Services shall review and may approve or deny any contract between the managed care organization and the state pharmacy benefit manager;

Any fee established, modified, or implemented directly or indirectly by a managed care organization, the state pharmacy benefit manager, or an entity which contracts on behalf of a pharmacy that is directly or indirectly charged to, passed onto, or required to be paid by a pharmacy services administration organization, pharmacy, or Medicaid recipient shall be submitted to the Department for Medicaid Services for approval. This paragraph shall not apply to any membership fee or service fee established, modified, or implemented by a pharmacy services administration organization on a pharmacy licensed in Kentucky that is not directly or indirectly related to product reimbursement; and

The provisions of KRS 205.5512 and 205.5514.

The Department for Medicaid Services may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A as necessary to implement and administer its responsibilities under this section. These administrative regulations may include but are not limited to the assessment of fines, penalties, or sanctions for noncompliance.

The Department for Medicaid Services may consider any information ascertained pursuant to this section in the setting, creation, or approval of reimbursement rates used by a pharmacy benefit manager or an entity which contracts on behalf of a pharmacy.

HISTORY:
2016 ch. 79, § 7, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 157, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 70, § 8, effective March 27, 2020.